Missouri, session 2026, SB962.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.1001, to read as
follows:
167.1001. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Election", any primary, general, or special
election held to nominate or elect an individual to public
office, to retain or recall an elected officeholder, or to
submit a ballot measure to the voters;
(2) "Parent", a student's parent, legal guardian, or
person standing in loco parentis to the student;
(3) "School", any school that is funded in whole or in
part by state funds, including, but not limited to, a public
school or charter school.
2. A student shall not be considered absent from the
school in which the student is enrolled for the time during
which the student accompanies his or her parent when the
parent is exercising his or her right to vote in a scheduled
election.

SB 962 2
3. A student may receive an excused absence pursuant
to subsection 2 of this section only one time during each
scheduled election.
4. A student who accompanies his or her parent when
the parent is exercising his or her right to vote in a
scheduled election shall be encouraged by school officials
to demonstrate his or her attendance at the scheduled
election by wearing an official sticker, badge, or other
item upon his or her return to school indicating that he or
she attended the scheduled election.
✓